Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2585.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 155A.49 Accessible prescription-related measures ââ persons who are blind, visually impaired, or have other print disabilities. 1. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to ensure that on or before January 1, 2027, if a person who is blind, has a visual impairment, or other print disability requests access to prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides, a pharmacy provides access to prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides, or refers the person to a pharmacy that provides access to prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides. The accessibility measures shall House File 2585, p. 2 meet all of the following requirements: a. Be provided at no additional cost to such persons. b. After a reasonable development period for the pharmacy, provide required information on prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides in a format that is fully accessible to such persons within a time frame comparable to a person that is not blind, does not have a visual impairment, or other print disability. 2. On or before April 1 of each year, the board shall publish a list on the boardâs internet site that contains the pharmacies that provide accessibility measures. 3. This section shall apply to any pharmacy that is dispensing prescription drugs in the state except for the following: a. An institutional pharmacy. For the purpose of this subsection, âinstitutional pharmacyâ means a pharmacy located within a hospital, nursing home, or long-term care facility. b. A pharmacy participating in a prescription drug donation repository program pursuant to chapter 135M, if the drug being dispensed was donated under the program. c. A pharmacy in a jail, a state correctional institution, a federal correctional facility, or a juvenile detention home. 4. In adopting rules under this section, the board shall solicit input from persons who are blind, have a visual impairment, or other print disability. 5. The rules adopted under this section shall meet all of the following requirements: a. Comply with current guidelines and recommendations from the United States government accountability office, and current industry standards. b. Include a method for providing notice to the public that accessible prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides are available, including notice regarding the availability of the prescription drug labels, bag tags, and medical guides in audio format. House File 2585, p. 3 Sec. 2. ACCESSIBLE PRESCRIPTION-RELATED MEASURES ââ REPORT. The board of pharmacy shall submit a report to the governor and the general assembly on or before January 1, 2028, that provides a summary of the progress on implementing rules, and recommendations for additional measures to improve accessibility. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2585, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor